Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.10-040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the selection and appointment of the secretary, the board shall set the
qualifications for the position of the secretary, employ a national search firm and
conduct a nationwide search for candidates, and select from that list three (3)
candidates for secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development. The names of
the three (3) candidates shall be submitted to the Governor who shall choose one of
them as secretary, except that, if the Governor so chooses, he or she may reject the
first list of names and direct the board to submit a list of three (3) additional names,
from which he or she shall appoint the secretary. Once appointed, the secretary
shall serve at the pleasure of the board.
(2) The secretary shall be a person with significant experience and established
reputation as an economic development professional.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:09 PM Jacketed